Oklahoma, session 2025, SB876.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 12 O.S. 2021, Section 95, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 95. A. Civil actions other than for the recovery of


real property can only be brought within the following periods,


after the cause of action shall have accrued, and not afterwards:


1. Within five (5) years: An action upon any contract,


agreement, or promise in writing;


2. Within three (3) years: An action upon a contract express


or implied not in writing; an action upon a liability created by


statute other than a forfeiture or penalty; and an action on a


foreign judgment;



Req. No. 312 Page 1


3. Within two (2) years: An action for trespass upon real


property; an action for taking, detaining, or injuring personal


property, including actions for the specific recovery of personal


property; an action for injury to the rights of another, not arising


on contract, and not hereinafter enumerated; an action for relief on


the ground of fraud - the cause of action in such case shall not be


deemed to have accrued until the discovery of the fraud;


4. Within one (1) year: An action for libel, slander, assault,


battery, malicious prosecution, or false imprisonment; an action


upon a statute for penalty or forfeiture, except where the statute


imposing it prescribes a different limitation;


5. An action upon the official bond or undertaking of an


executor, administrator, guardian, sheriff, or any other officer, or


upon the bond or undertaking given in attachment, injunction,


arrest, or in any case whatever required by the statute, can only be


brought within five (5) years after the cause of action shall have


accrued;


6. An action based on intentional conduct brought by any person


for recovery of damages for injury suffered as a result of childhood


sexual abuse incidents or exploitation as defined by Section 1-1-105


of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes or incest against the actual


perpetrator shall be commenced by the forty-fifth birthday of the


alleged victim. If the person committing the act of sexual abuse


against a child was employed by an institution, agency, firm,

Req. No. 312 Page 2


business, corporation or other public or private legal entity that


owed a duty of care to the victim, or the accused and the child were


engaged in some activity over which the legal entity had some degree


of responsibility or control, the action must be brought against


such employer or legal entity within two (2) years; provided, that


the time limit for commencement of an action pursuant to this


paragraph is tolled for a child until the child reaches the age of


eighteen (18) years. No action may be brought against the alleged


perpetrator or the estate of the alleged perpetrator after the death


of such alleged perpetrator, unless the perpetrator was convicted of


a crime of sexual abuse involving the claimant. An action pursuant


to this paragraph must be based upon objective verifiable evidence


in order for the victim to recover damages for injuries suffered by


reason of such sexual abuse, exploitation, or incest. The victim


need not establish which act in a series of continuing sexual abuse


incidents, exploitation incidents, or incest caused the injury


complained of;


7. An action based on intentional conduct brought by any person


for recovery of damages for injury suffered as a result of criminal


actions, as defined by the Oklahoma Statutes, may be brought against


any person incarcerated or under the supervision of a state, federal


or local correctional facility on or after November 1, 2003:


a. at any time during the incarceration of the offender


for the offense on which the action is based, or

Req. No. 312 Page 3


b. within five (5) years after the perpetrator is


released from the custody of a state, federal or local


correctional facility, if the defendant was serving


time for the offense on which the action is based;


8. An action to establish paternity and to enforce support


obligations can be brought any time before the child reaches the age


of eighteen (18);


9. An action to establish paternity can be brought by a child


in accordance with Section 7700-606 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


10. Court-ordered child support is owed until it is paid in


full and it is not subject to a statute of limitations;


11. All actions filed by an inmate or by a person based upon


facts that occurred while the person was an inmate in the custody of


one of the following:


a. the State of Oklahoma,


b. a contractor of the State of Oklahoma, or


c. a political subdivision of the State of Oklahoma,


to include, but not be limited to, the revocation of earned credits


and claims for injury to the rights of another, shall be commenced


within one (1) year after the cause of action shall have accrued;


and


12. An action based on intentional conduct brought by any


person for recovery of damages for injury suffered as a result of

Req. No. 312 Page 4


sexual assault as defined by Section 142.20 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes shall be commenced within four (4) years after the


injured person leaves the dependency of the abuser or within four


(4) years from the time of discovery by the injured party of both


the injury and the causal relationship between the injury and the


abuse, whichever occurs later; and


13. An action for relief, not hereinbefore provided for, can


only be brought within five (5) years after the cause of action


shall have accrued.


B. Collection of debts owed by inmates who have received damage


awards pursuant to Section 566.1 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma


Statutes shall be governed by the time limitations imposed by that


section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-312 CN 1/19/2025 5:45:03 AM

















Req. No. 312 Page 5